Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2016
System, defined.

System shall mean any equipment, vehicles, facilities, personnel, or contractors utilized for the purpose of collection, source separation, storage, transportation, transfer, processing, treatment, or disposal of solid waste.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 16.